District of Columbia statutes.
47-2886.14

Unlawful acts.

Whoever shall engage or offer to engage in the practice of engineering without being registered, or exempted, as provided in this part, or by verbal claim, sign, letterhead, card, or in any other way represent himself to be a professional engineer or through the use of any title including the word “engineer” or words of like import, or any other title, imply that he is a professional engineer without being registered as provided in this part, or shall present or attempt to use as his own the registration certificate of another, or shall give any false or forged evidence of any kind to the Board, or to any member thereof, in order to obtain registration as a professional engineer, or shall use any suspended or revoked registration, or shall otherwise violate the laws relating to the practice of engineering shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punishable by a fine of not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01] or imprisonment for not more than 1 year, or both. Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this part, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this part, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this part shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

Sept. 19, 1950, 64 Stat. 865, ch. 953, § 14
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42,§ 442, 32 DCR 4450
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 286(x), 60 DCR 2064

Board of Registration for Professional Engineers abolished: See note to § 47-2886.05.

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 286(x) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not more than $500”.
D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.
1973 Ed., § 2-1814.
1981 Ed., § 2-2314.